Connecticut, session 2026, HB05014.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish a credit
against the tax imposed under chapter 208 of the general statutes for
apprenticeships in information technology commenced by a taxpayer
under a qualified apprenticeship training program.